nl: ADS-B-mogelijkheid vliegtuig: Voorzien van ADS-B in/out; Voorzien van ADS-B out; Niet voorzien; Onbekend; Overig
nb: Aircraft annonse-B funksjonalitet: Utstyrt med ADS-B inn/ut; Utstyrt med ADS-B ut; Ikke utstyrt; Ukjent; Annet
pt-BR: Funcionalidade ADS-B da aeronave: Equipado com ADS-B in/out; Equipado com ADS-B out; Não equipado; Desconhecido; Outros
hr-HR: Mogućnost letjelice za ADS-B: Opremljeno sustavom ADS-B in/out; Opremljeno sustavom ADS-B out; Nije opremljeno; Nepoznato; Ostalo
th: ความสามารถด้าน ADS-B ของอากาศยาน: ติดตั้ง ADS-B In/Out; ติดตั้ง ADS-B Out; ไม่ได้ติดตั้ง; ไม่ทราบ; อื่นๆ
tr: Uçak ADS-B özelliği: ADS-B In/Out donanımlı; ADS-B Out donanımlı; Donanımsız; Bilinmiyor; Diğer
zh-TW: 飛機 ADS-B 功能: 配備 ADS-B In/Out; 配備 ADS-B Out; 未配備; 未知; 其他
it: Capacità ADS-B del velivolo: Dotato di ADS-B In/Out; Dotato di ADS-B Out; Non dotato; Sconosciuto; Altro
el: Ικανότητα αεροσκάφους ADS-B: Εξοπλισμένο με ADS-B in/out; Εξοπλισμένο με ADS-B out; Χωρίς εξοπλισμό; Άγνωστο; Άλλο
pl: Obsługa technologii ADS-B przez statek powietrzny: Wyposażenie w ADS-B In/Out; Wyposażenie w ADS-B Out; Brak wyposażenia; Nieznane; Inne
en: Aircraft ADS-B capability: ADS-B in/out equipped; ADS-B out equipped; Not equipped; Unknown; Other
sv: Flygplanets ADS-B-kapacitet: Utrustad med ADS-B in/ut; Utrustad med ADS-B ut; Inte utrustad; Okänd; Övrigt
vi: Khả năng ADS-B của máy bay: Trang bị ADS-B In/Out; Trang bị ADS-B Out; Không được trang bị; Không xác định; Khác
de: ADS-B-Fähigkeit des Flugzeugs: Mit ADS-B In/Out ausgestattet; Mit ADS-B Out ausgestattet; Nicht ausgestattet; Unbekannt; Andere
pt-PT: Capacidade ADS-B da aeronave: Equipado com ADS-B in/out; Equipado com ADS-B out; Não equipado; Desconhecido; Outro
fi: Lentokoneen ADS-B-kyvykkyys: ADS-B in/out -varusteltu; ADS-B out -varusteltu; Ei varusteltu; Tuntematon; Muu
fr: Fonctionnalité ADS-B de l’aéronef: Équipé d’ADS-B in/out; Équipé d’ADS-B out; Non équipé; Inconnu; Autre
zh-CN: 飞机 ADS-B 能力: 配备 ADS-B in/out; 配备 ADS-B out; 未配备; 未知; 其他
bg-BG: Възможност на въздухоплавателното средство за ADS-B: Оборудван с ADS-B in/out; Оборудван с ADS-B out; Не е оборудван; Неизвестно; Други
cs: Funkce ADS-B letadla: Vybaveno ADS-B In/Out; Vybaveno ADS-B Out; Nevybaveno; Neznámé; Ostatní
ro-RO: Capacitatea ADS B a aeronavei: Echipat cu ADS-B in/out; Echipat cu ADS-B out; Neechipat; Necunoscut; Altele
lt-LT: Orlaivio ADS-B funkcija: Su ADS-B in/out sistema; Įdiegta „ADS-B Out“; Be įrangos; Nežinoma; Kita
sl-SI: Zmogljivost sistema ADS-B za letala: Opremljeno z ADS-B In/Out; Opremljeno z ADS-B Out; Ni opremljeno; Neznano; Drugo
ko: 항공기 ADS-B 기능: ADS-B In/Out 장착; ADS-B Out 장착; 미장착; 알 수 없음; 기타
hu: Repülőgép ADS-B képessége: ADS-B in/out felszerelt; ADS-B out felszerelt; Nincs felszerelve; Ismeretlen; Egyéb
es: Capacidad ADS-B de la aeronave: Equipado con ADS-B in/out; Equipado con ADS-B out; No equipado; Desconocido; Otro
ja: 航空機広告-B機能: ADS-B In/Out 搭載; ADS-B Out 搭載; 未搭載; 不明; その他
da: Luftfartøjs ADS-B-kapacitet: Udstyret med ADS-B in/out; Udstyret med ADS-B out; Ikke udstyret; Ukendt; Andet
sk-SK: Reklama na lietadlá - schopnosť B: Vybavené ADS-B in/out; Vybavené ADS-B out; Nevybavené; Neznáme; Iné
ru: Поддержка ADS-B самолетом: Оснащено ADS-B In/Out; Оснащено ADS-B Out; Не оснащено; Неизвестно; Другое